Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.040

Written contract required—Contract entered by loan originator binding on mortgage broker—Written loan broker agreement required.

(1) Every contract between a mortgage broker, or a loan originator, and a borrower must be in writing and contain the entire agreement of the parties.

(2) Any contract under this section entered by a loan originator is binding on the mortgage broker.

(3) A mortgage broker must have a written loan broker agreement with a lender before any solicitation of, or contracting with, the public.

[ 2015 c 229 s 9; 2006 c 19 s 6; 1994 c 33 s 19; 1987 c 391 s 6.]